Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 8. Private Foundations

§ 561.
Prohibited acts.

No corporation which is a “private foundation” as defined in section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall:

engage in any act of “self-dealing” (as defined in section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986), which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4941(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

retain any “excess business holdings” (as defined in section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986), which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4943(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

make any investment which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of its exempt purposes, within the meaning of section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4944(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

make any “taxable expenditures” (as defined in section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986) which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4945(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 1.

§ 562.
Distributions required.

Each corporation which is a “private foundation” as defined in section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall distribute, for the purposes specified in its articles of organization, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by section 4942(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 2.

§ 563.
Conformity with articles of association.

The provisions of sections 561 and 562 of this title shall not apply to any corporation to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that such application would be contrary to the terms of the articles of organization or other instrument governing such corporation or governing the administration of charitable funds held by it and that the same may not properly be changed to conform to such sections.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 3.

§ 564.
Powers of Attorney General.

Nothing in this act shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the Attorney General of this State with respect to any corporation.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 4.

§ 565.
Trusts.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation,” as defined in section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, a “charitable trust,” as defined in section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or a “split-interest trust” as defined in section 4947(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, the following acts shall be prohibited:

engaging in any act of “self-dealing” (as defined in section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986), which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4941(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

retaining any “excess business holdings” (as defined in section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4943(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

making any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4944(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

making any “taxable expenditures” (as defined in section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986) which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by section 4945(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

provided, however, that this section shall not apply either to those split-interest trusts or to amounts thereof which are not subject to the prohibitions applicable to private foundations by reason of the provisions of section 4947 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 5.

§ 566.
Distribution required.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation” as defined in section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or which is a “charitable trust” as defined in section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, there shall be distributed, for the purposes specified in the trust instrument, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by section 4942(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 6.

§ 567.
Effect of trust instrument.

The provisions of sections 565 and 566 of this title shall not apply to any trust to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that such application would be contrary to the terms of the instrument governing such trust and that the same may not properly be changed to conform to such sections.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 7.

§ 568.
Future federal amendments.

All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall include future amendments to such sections and corresponding provisions of future internal revenue laws.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 112

, § 8.